Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-150
Cooperative extension work; federal aid; acceptance; disbursement.

Whole and complete assent and acceptance is given to the provisions and requirements of the Act of Congress passed May 8, 1914, providing for cooperative extension work. The State Treasurer is authorized to receive the grants of money appropriated and to pay warrants drawn by the Director of Administrative Services upon certificates presented by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska in payment of expenses of the Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Nebraska in accordance with the terms and conditions specified in the Act of Congress.

Laws 1915, c. 231, § 1, p. 535;

C.S.1922, § 6767;

C.S.1929, § 85-153;

R.S.1943, § 85-150;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 67.